nl: Formuleauto serie/klasse: Formule 1 (F1); Formule 2 (F2); Formule 2000; Formule 3 (F3); Formule 4 (F4); Formule Atlantic; Formule E; Formule Ford; Formula Regional; Formule Renault; Formule SAE; Formule Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Overige
zh-CN: 方程式赛车系列/级别: 一级方程式赛车 (F1); 二级方程式赛车 (F2); 2000 方程式赛车; 三级方程式赛车 (F3); 四级方程式赛车 (F4); 大西洋方程式赛车; Formula E; 福特方程式赛车; 区域方程式赛车; 雷诺方程式赛车; SAE 方程式赛车; Vee 方程式赛车; Indy NXT; IndyCar; 超级方程式赛车; 其他
tr: Formula otomobil serisi/sınıfı: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Diğer
ro-RO: Serie/clasă de mașini de curse: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Altele
es: Serie o clase de autos monoplaza: Fórmula 1 (F1); Fórmula 2 (F2); Fórmula 2000; Fórmula 3 (F3); Fórmula 4 (F4); Fórmula Atlantic; Fórmula E; Fórmula Ford; Fórmula Regional; Fórmula Renault; Fórmula SAE; Fórmula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Súper Fórmula; Otro
sl-SI: Serija/razred formule: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Drugo
pl: Seria/klasa samochodu Formuły: Formuła 1 (F1); Formuła 2 (F2); Formuła 2000; Formuła 3 (F3); Formuła 4 (F4); Formuła Atlantic; Formuła E; Formuła Ford; Formuła Regionalna; Formuła Renault; Formuła SAE; Formuła Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Inna
zh-TW: 方程式賽車系列/級別: 一級方程式賽車 (F1); 二級方程式賽車 (F2); 2000方程式賽車; 三級方程式賽車 (F3); 四級方程式賽車 (F4); 大西洋方程式賽車; 電動方程式賽車 (Formula E); 福特方程式賽車; 區域方程式賽車; 雷諾方程式賽車; SAE 方程式賽車; Vee 方程式賽車; Indy NXT; 印地賽車 (IndyCar); 超級方程式賽車; 其他
ko: 포뮬러카 시리즈/클래스: 포뮬러 1(F1); 포뮬러 2(F2); 포뮬러 2000; 포뮬러 3(F3); 포뮬러 4(F4); 포뮬러 아틀란틱; 포뮬러 E; 포뮬러 포드; 포뮬러 리저널; 포뮬러 르노; 포뮬러 SAE; 포뮬러 비; 인디 NXT; 인디카; 슈퍼 포뮬러; 기타
de: Formelwagen-Serie/Klasse: Formel 1 (F1); Formel 2 (F2); Formel 2000; Formel 3 (F3); Formel 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formel E; Formel Ford; Formula Regional; Formel Renault; Formula SAE; Formel V; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Sonstiges
hu: Formula autó sorozat/osztály: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Egyéb
it: Serie/classe di Formula Car: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Altro
sk-SK: Séria/trieda pretekárskych formúl: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Iné
th: ซีรีส์/ประเภทรถฟอร์มูล่า: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; อื่นๆ
ja: フォーミュラカーシリーズ／クラス: フォーミュラ 1 (F1); フォーミュラ 2 (F2); フォーミュラ 2000; フォーミュラ 3 (F3); フォーミュラ 4 (F4); フォーミュラ・アトランティック; フォーミュラ E; フォーミュラ・フォード; フォーミュラ・リージョナル; フォーミュラ・ルノー; フォーミュラ SAE; フォーミュラ Vee; インディ NXT; インディカー; スーパーフォーミュラ; その他
en: Formula car series/class: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Other
ru: Серия/класс формульных автомобилей: Формула-1 (F1); Формула-2 (F2); Формула 2000; Формула-3 (F3); Формула-4 (F4); Формула Атлантик; Формула-E; Формула Форд; Формула Regional; Формула Рено; Формула SAE; Формула Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Супер Формула; Другое
bg-BG: Серия/клас на болидите от Формула: Формула 1 (F1); Формула 2 (F2); Формула 2000; Формула 3 (F3); Формула 4 (F4); Формула Атлантик; Формула E; Формула Форд; Формула Регионал; Формула Рено; Формула SAE; Формула Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Супер Формула; Друго
fr: Série ou classe de monoplace: Formule 1 (F1); Formule 2 (F2); Formule 2000; Formule 3 (F3); Formule 4 (F4); Formule Atlantique; Formule E; Formule Ford; Formule Régionale; Formule Renault; Formule SAE; Formule Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Autre
el: Σειρά/κατηγορία αυτοκινήτων φόρμουλας: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Άλλο
cs: Série/třída formulových vozů: Formule 1 (F1); Formule 2 (F2); Formule 2000; Formule 3 (F3); Formule 4 (F4); Formule Atlantic; Formule E; Formule Ford; Formule Regional; Formule Renault; Formule SAE; Formule Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Jiné
da: Serie/klasse for formelbiler: Formel 1 (F1); Formel 2 (F2); Formel 2000; Formel 3 (F3); Formel 4 (F4); Formel Atlantic; Formel E; Formel Ford; Formel Regional; Formel Renault; Formel SAE; Formel Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Andet
pt-PT: Série/classe de automóveis de Fórmula: Fórmula 1 (F1); Fórmula 2 (F2); Fórmula 2000; Fórmula 3 (F3); Fórmula 4 (F4); Fórmula Atlantic; Fórmula E; Fórmula Ford; Fórmula Regional; Fórmula Renault; Fórmula SAE; Fórmula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Fórmula; Outro
vi: Dòng/hạng xe đua Công thức: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Khác
sv: Formelbilserie/klass: Formel 1 (F1); Formel 2 (F2); Formel 2000; Formel 3 (F3); Formel 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formel E; Formel Ford; Formula Regional; Formel Renault; Formula SAE; Formel Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Övrigt
hr-HR: Serija/klasa Formula automobila: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Ostalo
fi: Formula-autojen sarja/luokka: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Muu
nb: Formelbilserie/klasse: Formula 1 (F1); Formula 2 (F2); Formula 2000; Formula 3 (F3); Formula 4 (F4); Formula Atlantic; Formula E; Formula Ford; Formula Regional; Formula Renault; Formula SAE; Formula Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Annet
lt-LT: Formulės automobilio serija / klasė: Formulė 1 (F1); Formulė 2 (F2); Formulė 2000; Formulė 3 (F3); Formulė 4 (F4); Formulė Atlantic; Formulė E; Formulė Ford; Formulė Regional; Formulė Renault; Formulė SAE; Formulė Vee; Indy NXT; IndyCar; Super Formula; Kita
pt-BR: Série/classe de carros de fórmula: Fórmula 1 (F1); Fórmula 2 (F2); Fórmula 2000; Fórmula 3 (F3); Fórmula 4 (F4); Fórmula Atlantic; Fórmula E; Fórmula Ford; Fórmula Regional; Fórmula Renault; Fórmula SAE; Fórmula Vee; Indy NXT; Fórmula Indy (IndyCar); Super Fórmula; Outra